Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2276.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-2402, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-2402. Obstructing governmental operations; classification A. A person commits obstructing governmental operations if, by using or threatening to use violence or physical force, such the person knowingly obstructs, impairs or hinders either of the following: 1. The performance of a governmental function by a public servant acting under color of his the public servant's official authority. ; or 2. The enforcement of the penal law or the preservation of the peace by a peace officer acting under color of his the peace officer's official authority. B. This section does not apply to the obstruction, impairment or hinderance hindrance of the making of an arrest. C. Obstructing governmental operations is a class 1 misdemeanor. END_STATUTE